North Carolina, session 2025, SB839.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Article 1 of Chapter 75 of the General Statutes is amended by adding
a new section to read:
"§ 75-45. Grocery Price Transparency Act.
(a) Definitions. – As used in this section, the following definitions apply:
(1) Algorithmic pricing. – The use of computational automated processes to
collect consumers' personal data and set individualized prices for consumers
based on that personal data.
(2) Anti-competitive merger. – A transaction involving mergers, acquisitions, or
consolidations of food retailers, food distributors, or food processors which
are likely to substantially lessen competition in North Carolina.
(3) Consumer. – A natural person who is seeking or has solicited to purchase,
lease, or receive a good or service for personal use.
(4) Dynamic pricing. – The practice of varying the prices of consumer goods or
services within the same business day based on demand or other factors,
including the use of algorithmic pricing.
(5) Food distributor. – A merchant that operates a business engaged in the
wholesale distribution of food to food retailers.
(6) Food processor. – A merchant that operates a business engaged in the
transformation of agricultural materials into food products.
(7) Food retailer. – A grocer or grocery section of a supermarket.
(b) Dynamic Pricing Ban. – Food retailers shall not engage in dynamic pricing.
(c) Exceptions. – The following shall not be considered a violation of subsection (b) of
this section:
(1) The use of promotional pricing offers, loyalty program benefits, or other
temporary discounts or changes to pricing related to retention of existing
customers.
(2) A difference in price based on objective costs attributable to providing
consumer goods or services to different consumers, such as difference in price
caused by shipping costs or taxes based on a consumer's location.
(3) Discounts provided to larger defined groups of consumers such as discounts
for military veterans, active duty personnel, senior citizens, children, teachers,
or students.
*S839-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(4) Price corrections resulting from a pricing error.
(5) Resetting a price following a system or network outage.
(d) Anti-Competitive Merger Ban. – Food retailers, food distributors, and food processors
shall not engage in anti-competitive mergers.
(e) Credit Card Surcharge Cap. – Food retailers shall not impose a surcharge of more
than two percent (2%) of the total transaction price on a consumer for electing to use a credit or
charge card.
(f) Price Transparency Team. – The North Carolina Department of Justice shall create a
team within its Consumer Protection Division to monitor and report the average prices of
groceries, fuel, water, electricity, gas, and internet in North Carolina entitled the Price
Transparency Team.
The Price Transparency Team shall publish quarterly reports on the first business day of each
quarter, accessible by the public through the North Carolina Department of Justice website. These
quarterly reports must include:
(1) Average prices of groceries, fuel, water, electricity, gas, and internet in North
Carolina for the previous quarter.
(2) Percentage change in average price of groceries, fuel, water, electricity, gas,
and internet from the quarter immediately preceding the quarter being
reported.
(g) A violation of this section is an unfair trade practice under G.S. 75-1.1."
SECTION 2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Justice the sum of five million dollars ($5,000,000) in recurring funds beginning in the 2026-2027
fiscal year to be allocated to the Office of the Attorney General to support enforcement of the
Grocery Price Transparency Act of Article 1 of Chapter 75 of the General Statutes, as enacted
by this act.
SECTION 3. This act is effective October 1, 2026.
Page 2 Senate Bill 839-First Edition